Washington statutes.
RCW 19.142.080

Failure to comply with bond or trust account requirements—Class C felony.

Failure to furnish a bond as required by RCW 19.142.070 or to maintain a trust account as required by RCW 19.142.060 shall constitute a class C felony punishable as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 1987 c 317 s 9.]